Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1559.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Employee Right to Privacy Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic monitoring." The collection of information on an employer's premises concerning employees' activities or communications by any means other than direct observation, including the use of a computer, telephone, wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photo-optical systems. The term does not include the collection of information for security purposes in common areas of the employer's premises that are 123456789101112131415161718 held out for use by the public, or which collection is prohibited under Federal or State law."Employee." Any person who is employed or performs services for an employer. The term includes an independent contractor."Employer." Any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, receiver, agent, officer, officer of a court of this Commonwealth or other person or agent of an entity under this definition.Section 3. Notification of electronic monitoring.Except as provided in section 4, an employer who engages in any type of electronic monitoring shall give prior written notice to all employees who may be affected informing the employees of the types of monitoring that may occur. Each employer shall post, in a conspicuous location that is readily available for viewing by an employee, a notice concerning the types of electronic monitoring in which the employer may engage. The posting under this section shall constitute prior written notice.Section 4. Exception.If an employer has reasonable grounds to believe that an employee is engaged in conduct that violates the law, violates the legal rights of the employer or the employer's employees or creates a hostile workplace environment and electronic monitoring may produce evidence of misconduct, the employer may conduct monitoring without giving prior written notice.Section 5. Penalty.(a) Violations.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person who violates this act shall be subject to a penalty of $500 for a first offense. A second violation of this act shall result in a penalty of $2,000. A person shall be 20250HB1559PN1846 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subject to a $5,000 penalty for a third or subsequent violation of this act.(b) Evidence.--Repeat violations of this act may constitute evidence of harassment for the purpose of private causes of action against an employer by an employee. The payment of a fine by an employer shall not be an alternative to private action.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1559PN1846 - 3 - 12345678